Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
346F]

NURSING
FACILITY SUSTAINABILITY PROGRAM

Section

346F-1 Title

346F-2 Findings and declaration of necessity

346F-3 Definitions

346F-4 Nursing facility sustainability program
special fund

346F-5 Nursing facility sustainability fee

346F-6 Nursing facility sustainability fee
assessment

346F-7 Federal approval

346F-8 Multifacility locations

346F-9 Penalties for failure to pay nursing
facility

sustainability fee

346F-10 Enhanced rates to medicaid managed care health
plans

346F-11 Payment of rate enhancement

346F-12 Special designation of nursing facility
sustainability

program special fund

346F-13 Termination

346F-14 Severability

Note

Chapter repealed June 30, 2017, except for §346F-4, which is
repealed December 31, 2017. L 2012, c 156, §5; L 2013, c 142, §3; L 2014, c
124, §2; L 2015, c 69, §2; L 2016, c 59, §2.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next